Louisiana, session 2026, HB293.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:302(introductory paragraph) and 332(A)(1) and (2), (B), (C)(1)
and (2), (D) through (F), (H)(1), (3), and (4), and (I) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 23:302(11) and (12) and 332(J) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§302. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter and unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following terms shall have the following meanings ascribed to them:
* * *
(11) "Gender identity" means a gender-related identity, appearance, or
behavior, regardless of the individual's physiology or designated sex at birth.
Gender-related identity may be shown by providing evidence, including but not
limited to medical history, care, or treatment of the gender-related identity,
consistent and uniform assertion of the gender-related identity, or any other evidence
that the gender-related identity is sincerely held as a part of a person's core identity
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-732 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 293
provided, however, that gender-related identity is not asserted for any improper
purpose.
(12) "Sexual orientation" means an individual's actual or perceived
heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality.
* * *
§332. Intentional discrimination in employment
A. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for an employer to
engage in any of the following practices:
(1) Intentionally fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any individual, or
otherwise to intentionally discriminate against any individual with respect to
compensation, or terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, because of the
individual's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national
origin, military status, or natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
(2) Intentionally limit, segregate, or classify employees or applicants for
employment in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of
employment opportunities, or otherwise adversely affect the individual's status as an
employee, because of the individual's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or cultural
hairstyle.
* * *
B. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for an employment
agency to intentionally fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise to
intentionally discriminate against, any individual because of his race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, military status, or to
intentionally classify or refer for employment any individual on the basis of his race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, military
status, or natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
C. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for a labor organization
to engage in any of the following practices:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-732 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 293
(1) Intentionally exclude or intentionally expel from its membership, or
otherwise intentionally discriminate against, any individual because of his race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, military
status, or natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
(2) Intentionally limit, segregate, or classify its membership or applicants for
membership, or intentionally classify or fail or refuse to refer for employment any
individual in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of
employment opportunities, or would limit such employment opportunities, or
otherwise adversely affect his status as an employee or as an applicant for
employment, because of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or
cultural hairstyle.
* * *
D. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for any employer, labor
organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship or
other training or retraining, including on-the-job training programs, to discriminate
against any individual because of his race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or cultural
hairstyle in admission to, or employment in, any program established to provide
apprenticeship or other training.
E. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for an employer,
employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job
training programs, to print or publish, or cause to be printed or published, any notice
or advertisement relating to employment by an employer or membership in or any
classification or referral for employment by a labor organization, or relating to any
classification or referral for employment by an employment agency, or relating to
admission to, or employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship
or other training by a joint labor-management committee, indicating any preference,
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-732 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 293
limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or
cultural hairstyle. However, a notice or advertisement may indicate a preference,
limitation, specification, or discrimination based on religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, or national origin when religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, military status, or national origin is a bona fide occupational qualification
for employment.
F. It shall be unlawful discrimination in employment for an insurer to engage
in any of the following practices:
(1) Intentionally fail or refuse to appoint or to discharge any insurance agent,
or otherwise to intentionally discriminate against any insurance agent with respect
to his compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, because of the
insurance agent's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
(2) Intentionally limit, segregate, or classify his insurance agents or
applicants for an insurance agent in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive
any insurance agent or applicant of employment opportunities, or otherwise
adversely affect his status as an insurance agent or applicant because of the insurance
agent's or applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, military status, or natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
* * *
H. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, it shall not be
unlawful discrimination in employment for:
(1) An employer to hire and employ employees, for an employment agency
to classify or refer for employment any individual, for a labor organization to
classify its membership or to classify or refer for employment any individual, or for
an employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling
apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs to admit or employ any
individual in any such program on the basis of his religion, sex, sexual orientation,
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-732 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 293
gender identity, or national origin in those certain instances where religion, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or national origin is a bona fide
occupational qualification reasonably necessary for the normal operation of that
particular business or enterprise.
* * *
(3) An employer to apply different standards of compensation or different
terms, conditions, or privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or
merit system, or a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of
production, or any other differential based on any factor other than sex, or to
employees who work in different locations, provided that such differences are not
the result of an intention to discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, national origin, or natural, protective, or cultural
hairstyle.
(4) An employer to give and to act upon the results of any professionally
developed ability test, provided that such test, its administration, or action upon the
results is not designed, intended, or used to discriminate because of race, color,
religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, military status, or
natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle.
I. Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to infringe upon the freedom
of expression, association, or the free exercise of religion protected by the First
Amendment of the United States Constitution and Article I, Section 8 of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
I. J. "Natural, protective, or cultural hairstyle" shall include includes but is
not limited to afros, dreadlocks, twists, locs, braids, cornrow braids, Bantu knots,
curls, and hair styled to protect hair texture or for cultural significance.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-732 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 293